Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Emergency Vehicles

189.910.
Definitions for KRS 189.920 to 189.950.

As used in KRS

189.920

to

189.950

, “emergency vehicle” means any vehicle used for emergency purposes by:

The Department of Kentucky State Police;

A public police department;

The Department of Corrections;

A sheriff’s office;

A rescue squad;

An emergency management agency if it is a publicly owned vehicle;

A licensed ambulance service, mobile integrated healthcare program, or medical first response provider licensed by the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services, for any vehicle used to respond to emergencies or to transport a patient with a critical medical condition;

Any vehicle commandeered by a police officer;

Any vehicle with the emergency lights required under KRS

189.920

used by a paid or volunteer fireman or paid or volunteer ambulance personnel, or a paid or local emergency management director while responding to an emergency or to a location where an emergency vehicle is on emergency call;

An elected coroner granted permission to equip a publicly or privately owned motor vehicle with lights and siren pursuant to KRS 189.920;

A deputy coroner granted permission to equip a publicly or privately owned motor vehicle with lights and siren pursuant to KRS 189.920;

Any vehicle used by an organ procurement organization while transporting a human organ or tissue for the purpose of organ recovery or transplantation in an emergency situation involving an imminent health risk; or

A conservation officer of the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

As used in KRS

189.920

to

189.950

, “public safety vehicle” means public utility repair vehicle; wreckers; state, county, or municipal service vehicles and equipment; highway equipment which performs work that requires stopping and standing or moving at slow speeds within the traveled portions of highways; and vehicles which are escorting wide-load or slow-moving trailers or trucks.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 93, § 1; 1986, ch. 220, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 419, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 16, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 233, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 226, § 106, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 124, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 173, § 24, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 17, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2011, ch. 99, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2019 ch. 100, § 23, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 115, § 10, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 126, § 11, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011). This section was amended by 2011 Ky. Acts chs. 17 and 99, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 99, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

189.920.
Flashing lights and sirens.

All fire department, rescue squad, or publicly owned emergency management agency emergency vehicles and all ambulances shall be equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating red lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws.

All state, county, or municipal police vehicles and all sheriffs’ vehicles used as emergency vehicles shall be equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws.

By ordinance, the governing body of any city or county may direct that the police or sheriffs’ vehicles in that jurisdiction be equipped with a combination of red and blue flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights.

All public safety vehicles shall be equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating yellow lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle. Yellow flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights may also be used by vehicles operated by mail carriers while on duty, funeral escort vehicles, and church buses.

All Department of Corrections vehicles used as emergency vehicles shall be equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle. The Department of Corrections vehicles shall not be equipped with or use a siren, whistle, or bell. The equipment prescribed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other equipment required by motor vehicle laws.

If authorized by the legislative body of a county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government:

All publicly owned county jail and regional jail vehicles used as emergency vehicles may be quipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle; and

An elected jailer or the chief administrator of a county or regional jail not managed by an elected jailer may equip (1) personally owned vehicle with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle.

Publicly owned county jail or regional jail vehicles shall not be equipped with or use a siren, whistle, or bell.

The equipment prescribed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws.

Red flashing lights may be used by school buses.

No emergency vehicle, public safety vehicle, or any other vehicle covered by KRS

189.910

to

189.950

shall use any light of any other color than those specified by KRS

189.910

to

189.950

. Sirens, whistles, and bells may not be used by vehicles other than those specified by KRS 189.910 to 189.950, except that any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal.

Vehicles used as command posts at incidents may be equipped with and use when on scene, a green rotating, oscillating, or flashing light. This light shall be in addition to the lights and sirens required in this section.

A personal vehicle used by a paid or volunteer firefighter, ambulance personnel, or emergency services director who is responding to an emergency shall display the lights required in subsection (1) of this section.

An elected coroner may equip a publicly or privately owned motor vehicle, or both, with flashing, rotating, or oscillating red and blue lights and a siren meeting the requirements of this section solely for the purpose of responding to a report of the death of a human being subject to the following terms and conditions:

The coroner makes a written request to the legislative body of the county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government in which the coroner was elected to equip a publicly or privately owned motor vehicle, or both, with flashing, rotating, or oscillating red and blue lights and a siren meeting the requirements of this section, and that request is approved by the legislative body by ordinance or by court order;

The coroner may use the lights and siren only while responding to the scene of the report of a death of a human being and shall not, KRS

189.940

to the contrary notwithstanding, exceed the posted speed limit; and

The permission granted pursuant to this section shall expire upon the coroner leaving office or the legislative body revoking the authorization.

A deputy coroner certified pursuant to KRS Chapter 72 may equip a publicly owned or privately owned motor vehicle, or both, with flashing, rotating, or oscillating red and blue lights and a siren meeting the requirements of this section solely for the purpose of responding to a report of the death of a human being, subject to the following terms and conditions:

The deputy coroner has made a written request to the coroner to equip a publicly owned or privately owned vehicle with flashing, rotating, or oscillating red and blue lights meeting the requirements of this section and the coroner has approved the request in writing;

The coroner makes a written request to the legislative body of the county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government in which the coroner is elected to permit the deputy coroner to equip a publicly owned motor vehicle or privately owned motor vehicle, or both, and that request has been approved by the legislative body by ordinance or by court order;

The deputy coroner may use the lights and siren only while responding to the scene of the report of the death of a human being and shall not, KRS

189.940

to the contrary notwithstanding, exceed the posted speed limit; and

The permission granted pursuant to this section shall expire upon the coroner leaving office or the legislative body revoking the authorization.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 93, § 2; 1984, ch. 55, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 419, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 17, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 226, § 107, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 173, § 25, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 17, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2011, ch. 99, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/8/2011). This section was amended by 2011 Ky. Acts chs. 17 and 99, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

189.930.
Right-of-way to emergency vehicles — Blocking or following emergency vehicles — Driving over unprotected hoses of fire department.

Upon the approach of an emergency vehicle equipped with, and operating, one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating red or blue lights, visible under normal conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of such vehicle; or the driver is given audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way, immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection, and stop and remain in such position until the emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer or firefighter.

Upon the approach of any emergency vehicle, operated in conformity with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the operator of every vehicle shall immediately stop clear of any intersection and shall keep such position until the emergency vehicle has passed, unless directed otherwise by a police officer or firefighter.

No operator of any vehicle, unless he is on official business, shall follow any emergency vehicle being operated in conformity with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section closer than five hundred (500) feet, nor shall he drive into, or park the vehicle into, or park the vehicle within, the block where the vehicle has stopped in answer to an emergency call or alarm unless he is directed otherwise by a police officer or firefighter.

No vehicle, train, or other equipment shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when the hose is laid down on any street, private driveway, or track for use at any fire or fire alarm unless the fire department official in command consents that the hose be driven over.

Upon approaching a stationary emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle, when the emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle is giving a signal by displaying alternately flashing yellow, red, red and white, red and blue, or blue lights, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall, while proceeding with due caution:

Yield the right-of-way by moving to a lane not adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if:

The person is driving on a highway having at least four (4) lanes with not fewer than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; and

If it is possible to make the lane change with due regard to safety and traffic conditions; or

Reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed to road conditions, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe.

This section does not operate to relieve the person who drives an emergency vehicle from the duty to operate the vehicle with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 93, § 3; 1980, ch. 371, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 215, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

189.940.
Exemptions from traffic regulations.

Except as provided in KRS

189.920

, the speed limitations set forth in the Kentucky Revised Statutes do not apply to:

Emergency vehicles when responding to emergency calls;

Police vehicles when in pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law;

Ambulances when transporting a patient to medical care facilities; or

Any vehicle used by an organ procurement organization while transporting a human organ or tissue for the purpose of organ recovery or transplantation in an emergency situation involving an imminent health risk; and

Emergency vehicles when the driver thereof is giving the warning required by subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section.

No portion of this subsection shall be construed to relieve the driver of the duty to operate the vehicle with due regard for the safety of all persons using the street or highway.

The driver of an emergency vehicle, when responding to an emergency call, or of a police vehicle in pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, or of an ambulance transporting a patient to a medical care facility and giving the warning required by subsection (5) of this section, upon approaching any red light or stop signal or any stop sign shall slow down as necessary for safety to traffic, but may proceed past such red or stop light or stop sign with due regard for the safety of persons using the street or highway.

The driver of an emergency vehicle, when responding to an emergency call, or of a police vehicle in pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, or of an ambulance transporting a patient to a medical care facility, or a vehicle used by an organ procurement organization transporting a human organ or tissue, and giving warning required by subsection (5) of this section, may drive on the left side of any highway or in the opposite direction of a one-way street provided the normal lanes of traffic are blocked and he or she does so with due regard for the safety of all persons using the street or highway.

The driver of an emergency or public safety vehicle may stop or park his vehicle upon any street or highway without regard to the provisions of KRS

189.390

and

189.450

, provided that, during the time the vehicle is parked at the scene of an emergency, at least one (1) warning light is in operation at all times.

The driver of an emergency vehicle desiring the use of any option granted by subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall give warning in the following manner:

By illuminating the vehicle’s warning lights continuously during the period of the emergency; and

By continuous sounding of the vehicle’s siren, bell, or exhaust whistle; unless

The vehicle is an ambulance and the driver is of the opinion that sounding of the siren, bell, or exhaust whistle would be detrimental to the victim’s health. In the event the driver of an ambulance elects not to use the siren, bell, or exhaust whistle he or she shall not proceed past red lights or drive in the opposite direction on a one-way street or in oncoming lanes of traffic unless no other vehicles are within five hundred (500) feet of the front of the ambulance. The driver shall not extinguish the warning lights during the period of the emergency.

No driver or operator of any emergency or public safety or other vehicle shall use the warning lights or siren, bell, or exhaust whistle of his or her vehicle for any purposes or under any circumstances other than those permitted by KRS

189.910

to

189.950

.

KRS

189.910

to

189.950

does not relieve the driver of any emergency or public safety vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and property upon the highway.

The driver of a public safety vehicle which also meets the definition of a slow-moving vehicle under KRS

189.810

and any vehicle acting as an escort for the slow-moving vehicle may travel at a speed that may impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic if:

The vehicle is being operated in an official capacity;

Operation of the vehicle is in compliance with all state and local government policies; and

It is necessary for the safe operation of the vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 93, § 4; 1974, ch. 308, § 36; 1980, ch. 371, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2011, ch. 99, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2022 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 126, § 12, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 35 and 126, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

189.945.
Prohibition against use of mobile infrared electronic transmitter — Exceptions — Penalties.

As used in this section, “MIRET” means a mobile infrared electronic transmitter or similar device that emits an infrared beam or electronic signal and may be used to change the lighting cycle of a traffic control signal.

A person shall not use a MIRET to change the lighting cycle of a traffic control signal, unless the person is an occupant of an emergency vehicle as defined by KRS

189.910

that is responding to or engaged in an emergency situation, or is an authorized employee, contractor, consultant, or vendor of the government agency responsible for the installation, maintenance, and testing of the traffic control signal or emergency vehicle preemption system, operating in the course and scope of his or her employment.

Except as provided for in subsection (4) of this section, any person who violates subsection (2) of this section shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

If a person is involved in a motor vehicle collision which involves physical injury as defined by KRS

500.080

while in violation of subsection (2) of this section, the person shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

If a person is involved in a motor vehicle collision which involves serious physical injury as defined by KRS

500.080

while in violation of subsection (2) of this section, the person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 28, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

189.950.
Prohibitions — Exceptions. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

No motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS

189.910

to

189.950

as emergency vehicles, shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a vehicle, any siren, whistle, or bell. Any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which shall be so arranged that it cannot be used as an ordinary warning signal.

No motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS

189.910

to

189.950

as emergency vehicles, shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any red or blue flashing, revolving, or oscillating light or place a red light on the front thereof. This subsection shall not apply to the use of red flashing lights on school buses or to stop lights or turn signals at the rear of any motor vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided for in this section, a person shall not illuminate a blue light that is affixed to a motor vehicle while operating the motor vehicle on a highway. This subsection shall not apply to:

Any light on a motorcycle that is not affixed to the front of the motorcycle; or

Nonhalogen headlamps that have a slight blue tint and meet United States Department of Transportation regulations.

No motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS

189.910

to

189.950

as public safety vehicles, shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon any vehicle any yellow flashing, revolving, or oscillating light. This subsection shall not apply to the use of yellow lights for turn signals; or to emergency flasher lights for use when warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing; or to vehicles operated by mail carriers while on duty; funeral escort vehicles and church buses.

Any person who is a regular or voluntary member of any fire department furnishing fire protection for a political subdivision of the state or any person who is a regular or voluntary member of a rescue squad may equip his vehicle with red flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights and a siren, bell, or exhaust whistle if he has first been given permission, in writing, to do so by the chief of the fire department or rescue squad. He may use such lights and equipment only while proceeding to the scene of a fire or other emergency or to a location where another emergency vehicle is on emergency call in the performance of his official duties as a member of a fire department or rescue squad.

Any constable may, upon approval of the fiscal court in the county of jurisdiction, equip vehicles used by said officer as emergency vehicles with one (1) or more flashing, rotating or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric condition from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of such vehicle, and a siren, whistle or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws. Any constable authorized by the fiscal court to utilize blue lights and a siren pursuant to this section shall maintain at least the insurance described by KRS

304.39-110

.

Any person who is a paid or voluntary member of any ambulance service furnishing emergency medical services for a political subdivision of the state may equip his vehicle with red flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights and a siren, bell, or exhaust whistle if he has first been given permission, in writing, to do so by the chief or director of the ambulance service. He may use such lights and equipment only while proceeding to the scene of an emergency, a medical facility, or to a location where another emergency vehicle is on emergency call in the performance of his official duties as a member of the ambulance service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 93, § 5; 1984, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 220, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 437, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2017 ch. 79, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

189.950.
Prohibitions — Exceptions. [Effective January 1, 2023]

No motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS

189.910

to

189.950

as emergency vehicles, shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a vehicle, any siren, whistle, or bell. Any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which shall be so arranged that it cannot be used as an ordinary warning signal.

No motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS

189.910

to

189.950

as emergency vehicles, shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any red or blue flashing, revolving, or oscillating light or place a red light on the front thereof. This subsection shall not apply to the use of red flashing lights on school buses or to stop lights or turn signals at the rear of any motor vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided for in this section, a person shall not illuminate a blue light that is affixed to a motor vehicle while operating the motor vehicle on a highway. This subsection shall not apply to:

Any light on a motorcycle that is not affixed to the front of the motorcycle; or

Nonhalogen headlamps that have a slight blue tint and meet United States Department of Transportation regulations.

No motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS

189.910

to

189.950

as public safety vehicles, shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon any vehicle any yellow flashing, revolving, or oscillating light. This subsection shall not apply to the use of yellow lights for turn signals; or to emergency flasher lights for use when warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing; or to vehicles operated by mail carriers while on duty; funeral escort vehicles and church buses.

Any person who is a regular or voluntary member of any fire department furnishing fire protection for a political subdivision of the state or any person who is a regular or voluntary member of a rescue squad may equip his or her vehicle with red flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights and a siren, bell, or exhaust whistle if he or she has first been given permission, in writing, to do so by the chief of the fire department or rescue squad. He or she may use such lights and equipment only while proceeding to the scene of a fire or other emergency or to a location where another emergency vehicle is on emergency call in the performance of his or her official duties as a member of a fire department or rescue squad.

Any constable meeting the requirements of KRS 70.325(2) may, upon approval of the fiscal court in the county of jurisdiction, the legislative council of an urban-county government, or the legislative body of a consolidated local government, equip vehicles used by said officer as emergency vehicles with one (1) or more flashing, rotating or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric condition from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of such vehicle, and a siren, whistle or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws. Any constable authorized by the fiscal court to utilize blue lights and a siren pursuant to this section shall maintain at least the insurance described by KRS

304.39-110

.

Any constable who has successfully completed a basic training course, as established by KRS

15.440

, at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and who maintains his or her certification as a peace officer pursuant to KRS

15.380

through his or her term of office as a constable, may equip vehicles used by that officer as emergency vehicles with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws. Any constable authorized to use blue lights and a siren pursuant to this section shall maintain at least the insurance described by KRS

304.39-110

.

The fiscal court in the county of jurisdiction, the legislative council of an urban-county government, or the legislative body of a consolidated local government may revoke this authorization, if the fiscal court, the council, or the body determines an issue of public safety or abuse by the constable.

Any person who is a paid or voluntary member of any ambulance service furnishing emergency medical services for a political subdivision of the state may equip his or her vehicle with red flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights and a siren, bell, or exhaust whistle if he or she has first been given permission, in writing, to do so by the chief or director of the ambulance service. He or she may use such lights and equipment only while proceeding to the scene of an emergency, a medical facility, or to a location where another emergency vehicle is on emergency call in the performance of his or her official duties as a member of the ambulance service.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 93, § 5; 1984, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 220, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 437, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2017 ch. 79, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 90, § 21, effective January 1, 2023.